California, session 20252026, AB1073.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1094.1 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:1094.1. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Permissible use” means verifying an employee’s wages or employer or using the employee’s wage information for credit granting and related account maintenance, residential leasing, employment screening, or insurance or government transactions, consistent with the purposes set forth in the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).(2) “Qualified third-party vendor” means a consumer reporting agency engaged in the business of furnishing consumer reports and who meets all of the following criteria:(A) Has executed contracts in place for the same or substantially similar service with at least three other states.(B) Has completed systems integration for the same or substantially similar service in one or more states.(C) Has had its business model and data sharing agreements and other collateral materials reviewed for conformance, either formally or informally, by the United States Department of Labor and found to be in conformity with relevant federal rules and regulations.(3) “Subscriber” means a person or entity that pays a fee to a qualified third-party vendor to obtain consumer reports or other information from the qualified third-party vendor.(4) “Wage information” means the employee’s full name, social security number, the employer’s name, and the total amount of wages paid to that employee each quarter, as reported to the department by the employer in its quarterly contribution return and report of wages.(b) The department shall release an employee’s wage information to a qualified third-party vendor if the employee has provided the department written permission for that release.(c) The department shall provide the employee’s wage information to the employee or their representative without charge.(d) The department shall allow, at the request of the employee, the electronic transmission of the employee’s wage information, directly to or through a qualified third-party vendor, for permissible uses.(e) The department shall enter into an agreement with a qualified third-party vendor to allow for electronic transmission of an employee’s wage information for permissible uses.(f) The qualified third-party vendor shall use the employee’s wage information received from the department pursuant to this section for a permissible use and may share the employee’s wage information with a subscriber subject to subdivision (g).(g) (1) A subscriber shall not request or receive wage information from a qualified third-party vendor pursuant to subdivision (f) unless the request is for a permissible use, and shall not use that wage information unless the use is a permissible use.(2) A subscriber shall only receive wage information about an employee from a qualified third-party vendor pursuant to subdivision (f) if the employee has provided written permission that authorizes the release of that employee’s wage information to a subscriber.(3) A subscriber shall not resell or redisclose wage information received from a qualified third-party vendor.(h) All wage information reported to the department and provided to a qualified third-party vendor pursuant to this section shall be confidential and shall remain subject to the confidentiality provisions contained in applicable federal and state laws.(i) The qualified third-party vendor shall require a person who receives wage information to keep that information confidential and to use the information only for the designated permissible use.(j) The department shall not expend any state funds to execute the terms of the agreement with the qualified third-party vendor.(k) The department, consistent with Part 603 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall charge and collect fees from a qualified third-party vendor to cover startup costs and the expenses incurred in preparation for releasing an employee’s wage information to a qualified third party for permissible uses in the administration of this section, not to exceed the reasonable costs of that administration.(l) Any person who knowingly accesses, uses, or discloses any information made confidential pursuant to this section without authorization pursuant to this section is in violation of this section and is guilty of a misdemeanor.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.(a)The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1)As California courts have recognized, the impulse of a judge to disfavor a litigant who prompted a higher court to reverse that judge’s decision is quite human.(2)Judicial bias is antithetical to the administration of justice and a well-functioning judicial system, and undermines the public’s trust in the judiciary.(3)Judicial bias is particularly a threat to the administration of justice in the courts of appeal, and especially in cases concerning voting rights, workers’ rights, and environmental justice.(4)Judicial bias in the courts of appeal can result in the delay of voting rights, workers’ rights, and environmental justice. This occurred in the California Voting Rights Act of 2001 case, Pico Neighborhood Assn. v. City of Santa Monica (2023) 15 Cal.5th 292, following the California Supreme Court’s reversal of the court of appeal’s decision, through the court of appeal’s refusal to follow the instruction of the California Supreme Court. Such delay is particularly harmful in voting rights cases because elections are held every two years while those cases remain pending.(5)The dilution of votes of a protected class, in even a single election, in violation of the California Voting Rights Act of 2001, is a matter of statewide concern. A concern that the Legislature must address.(6)A comprehensive evaluation of judicial recusal and disqualification at all levels of California courts, including the utility of peremptory challenges at the outset of cases as well as following reversal by a higher court, is necessary to refine the processes in those courts and promote the efficient administration of justice.(b)It is the intent of the Legislature to eliminate, insofar as possible, the impact of judicial bias, at all levels of the judiciary, and to promote the efficient administration of justice in California courts.SEC. 2.Section 170.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:170.6.(a)(1)A judge, court commissioner, or referee of a superior court of the State of California, or justice of a court of appeal of the State of California, shall not try a civil or criminal action or special proceeding of any kind or character nor hear any matter therein that involves a contested issue of law or fact when it is established as provided in this section that the judge, justice, or court commissioner is prejudiced against a party or attorney or the interest of a party or attorney appearing in the action or proceeding.(2)A party to, or an attorney appearing in, an action or proceeding may establish this prejudice by an oral or written motion without prior notice supported by affidavit or declaration under penalty of perjury, or an oral statement under oath, that the judge, justice, court commissioner, or referee before whom the action or proceeding is pending, or to whom it is assigned, is prejudiced against a party or attorney, or the interest of the party or attorney, so that the party or attorney cannot, or believes that they cannot, have a fair and impartial trial or hearing before the judge, justice, court commissioner, or referee.(A)If the judge, other than a judge assigned to the case for all purposes, court commissioner, or referee assigned to, or who is scheduled to try, the cause or hear the matter is known at least 10 days before the date set for trial or hearing, the motion shall be made at least 5 days before that date. If directed to the trial of a cause with a master calendar, the motion shall be made to the judge supervising the master calendar not later than the time the cause is assigned for trial. If directed to the trial of a criminal cause that has been assigned to a judge for all purposes, the motion shall be made to the assigned judge or to the presiding judge by a party within 10 days after notice of the all-purpose assignment, or if the party has not yet appeared in the action, then within 10 days after the appearance. If directed to the trial of a civil cause that has been assigned to a judge for all purposes, the motion shall be made to the assigned judge or to the presiding judge by a party within 15 days after notice of the all-purpose assignment, or if the party has not yet appeared in the action, then within 15 days after the appearance. If the court in which the action is pending is authorized to have no more than one judge, and the motion claims that the duly elected or appointed judge of that court is prejudiced, the motion shall be made before the expiration of 30 days from the date of the first appearance in the action of the party who is making the motion or whose attorney is making the motion. In no event shall a judge, court commissioner, or referee entertain the motion if it is made after the drawing of the name of the first juror, or if there is no jury, after the making of an opening statement by counsel for plaintiff, or if there is no opening statement by counsel for plaintiff, then after swearing in the first witness or the giving of any evidence or after trial of the cause has otherwise commenced. If the motion is directed to a hearing, other than the trial of a cause, the motion shall be made not later than the commencement of the hearing. In the case of trials or hearings not specifically provided for in this paragraph, the procedure specified herein shall be followed as nearly as possible. The fact that a judge, court commissioner, or referee has presided at, or acted in connection with, a pretrial conference or other hearing, proceeding, or motion prior to trial, and not involving a determination of contested fact issues relating to the merits, shall not preclude the later making of the motion provided for in this paragraph at the time and in the manner herein provided.(B)A motion under this paragraph directed to a judge, court commissioner, or referee of a superior court may be made following reversal on appeal of a trial court’s decision, or following reversal on appeal of a trial court’s final judgment, if the trial judge in the prior proceeding is assigned to conduct a new trial on the matter. Notwithstanding paragraph (4), the party who filed the appeal that resulted in the reversal of a final judgment of a trial court may make a motion under this section regardless of whether that party or side has previously done so. The motion shall be made within 60 days after the party or the party’s attorney has been notified of the assignment.(C)Following reversal by the California Supreme Court and remand to a court of appeal for further proceedings, other than of a ministerial nature, the presiding justice of the court of appeal shall assign the case to a panel of three justices and notify the parties of the assignment within 30 days of issuance of the remittitur to the court of appeal. A motion made under this paragraph directed to one or more justices of a court of appeal may only be made following reversal by the California Supreme Court of a court of appeal’s decision, where the court of appeal is required to conduct further proceedings other than of a ministerial nature, and may only be directed to the justice or justices who authored or concurred in the prior decision that was reversed and who is or are assigned to further consider the matter. Notwithstanding paragraph (4), the party who obtained the reversal of a decision of a court of appeal may make a motion under this section regardless of whether that party or side has previously done so. For cases reversed on or after January 1, 2026, the motion shall be made within 15 days after the party or the party’s attorney has been notified of the assignment. For cases reversed before January 1, 2026, and remaining pending as of the effective date of the act adding this subparagraph, the motion shall be made on or before January 16, 2026. Upon presentation of a motion under this paragraph directed to one or more justices of a court of appeal, the presiding justice may, at the presiding justice’s discretion, assign up to three new justices regardless of the number of justices to whom the motion is directed.(3)A party to a civil action making that motion under this section shall serve notice on all parties no later than five days after making the motion.(4)If the motion is duly presented, and the affidavit or declaration under penalty of perjury is duly filed or an oral statement under oath is duly made, thereupon and without any further act or proof, the judge supervising the master calendar, if any, or presiding justice shall assign some other judge, justice or justices, court commissioner, or referee to try the cause or hear the matter. In other cases, the trial of the cause or the hearing of the matter shall be assigned or transferred to another judge, panel of justices, court commissioner, or referee of the court in which the trial or matter is pending or, if there is no other judge, panel of justices, court commissioner, or referee of the court in which the trial or matter is pending, the Chair of the Judicial Council shall assign some other judge, justice or justices, court commissioner, or referee to try the cause or hear the matter as promptly as possible. Except as provided in this section, no party or attorney shall be permitted to make more than one such motion in any one action or special proceeding pursuant to this section. In actions or special proceedings where there may be more than one plaintiff or similar party or more than one defendant or similar party appearing in the action or special proceeding, only one motion for each side may be made in any one action or special proceeding.(5)Unless required for the convenience of the court or unless good cause is shown, a continuance of the trial or hearing shall not be granted by reason of the making of a motion under this section. If a continuance is granted, the cause or matter shall be continued from day to day or for other limited periods upon the trial or other calendar and shall be reassigned or transferred for trial or hearing as promptly as possible.(6)Any affidavit filed pursuant to this section shall be in substantially the following form:(Here set forth court and cause)State of California, ss.PEREMPTORY CHALLENGE County of____, being duly sworn, deposes and says: That they area party (or attorney for a party) to the within action (or special proceeding). That ____ the judge, justice, court commissioner, or referee before whom the trial of the (or a hearing in the) action (or special proceeding) is pending (or to whom it is assigned) is prejudiced against the party (or their attorney) or the interest of the party (or their attorney) so that affiant cannot or believes that they cannot have a fair and impartial trial or hearing before the judge, justice, court commissioner, or referee. Subscribed and sworn to before me this______ day of ______, 20__.(Clerk or notary public or otherofficer administering oath)(7)Any oral statement under oath or declaration under penalty of perjury made pursuant to this section shall include substantially the same contents as the affidavit above.(b)Nothing in this section shall affect or limit Section 170 or Title 4 (commencing with Section 392) of Part 2, and this section shall be construed as cumulative thereto.(c)If any provision of this section or the application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and, to this end, the provisions of this section are declared to be severable.(d)This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3.Section 170.6 is added to the Code of Civil Procedure, to read:170.6.(a)(1)   A judge, court commissioner, or referee of a superior court of the State of California shall not try a civil or criminal action or special proceeding of any kind or character nor hear any matter therein that involves a contested issue of law or fact when it is established as provided in this section that the judge or court commissioner is prejudiced against a party or attorney or the interest of a party or attorney appearing in the action or proceeding.(2)(A)A party to, or an attorney appearing in, an action or proceeding may establish this prejudice by an oral or written motion without prior notice supported by affidavit or declaration under penalty of perjury, or an oral statement under oath, that the judge, court commissioner, or referee before whom the action or proceeding is pending, or to whom it is assigned, is prejudiced against a party or attorney, or the interest of the party or attorney, so that the party or attorney cannot, or believes that they cannot, have a fair and impartial trial or hearing before the judge, court commissioner, or referee. If the judge, other than a judge assigned to the case for all purposes, court commissioner, or referee assigned to, or who is scheduled to try, the cause or hear the matter is known at least 10 days before the date set for trial or hearing, the motion shall be made at least 5 days before that date. If directed to the trial of a cause with a master calendar, the motion shall be made to the judge supervising the master calendar not later than the time the cause is assigned for trial. If directed to the trial of a criminal cause that has been assigned to a judge for all purposes, the motion shall be made to the assigned judge or to the presiding judge by a party within 10 days after notice of the all-purpose assignment, or if the party has not yet appeared in the action, then within 10 days after the appearance. If directed to the trial of a civil cause that has been assigned to a judge for all purposes, the motion shall be made to the assigned judge or to the presiding judge by a party within 15 days after notice of the all-purpose assignment, or if the party has not yet appeared in the action, then within 15 days after the appearance. If the court in which the action is pending is authorized to have no more than one judge, and the motion claims that the duly elected or appointed judge of that court is prejudiced, the motion shall be made before the expiration of 30 days from the date of the first appearance in the action of the party who is making the motion or whose attorney is making the motion. In no event shall a judge, court commissioner, or referee entertain the motion if it is made after the drawing of the name of the first juror, or if there is no jury, after the making of an opening statement by counsel for plaintiff, or if there is no opening statement by counsel for plaintiff, then after swearing in the first witness or the giving of any evidence or after trial of the cause has otherwise commenced. If the motion is directed to a hearing, other than the trial of a cause, the motion shall be made not later than the commencement of the hearing. In the case of trials or hearings not specifically provided for in this paragraph, the procedure specified herein shall be followed as nearly as possible. The fact that a judge, court commissioner, or referee has presided at, or acted in connection with, a pretrial conference or other hearing, proceeding, or motion prior to trial, and not involving a determination of contested fact issues relating to the merits, shall not preclude the later making of the motion provided for in this paragraph at the time and in the manner herein provided.(B)A motion under this paragraph may be made following reversal on appeal of a trial court’s decision, or following reversal on appeal of a trial court’s final judgment, if the trial judge in the prior proceeding is assigned to conduct a new trial on the matter. Notwithstanding paragraph (4), the party who filed the appeal that resulted in the reversal of a final judgment of a trial court may make a motion under this section regardless of whether that party or side has previously done so. The motion shall be made within 60 days after the party or the party’s attorney has been notified of the assignment.(3)A party to a civil action making that motion under this section shall serve notice on all parties no later than five days after making the motion.(4)If the motion is duly presented, and the affidavit or declaration under penalty of perjury is duly filed or an oral statement under oath is duly made, thereupon and without any further act or proof, the judge supervising the master calendar, if any, shall assign some other judge, court commissioner, or referee to try the cause or hear the matter. In other cases, the trial of the cause or the hearing of the matter shall be assigned or transferred to another judge, court commissioner, or referee of the court in which the trial or matter is pending or, if there is no other judge, court commissioner, or referee of the court in which the trial or matter is pending, the Chair of the Judicial Council shall assign some other judge, court commissioner, or referee to try the cause or hear the matter as promptly as possible. Except as provided in this section, no party or attorney shall be permitted to make more than one such motion in any one action or special proceeding pursuant to this section. In actions or special proceedings where there may be more than one plaintiff or similar party or more than one defendant or similar party appearing in the action or special proceeding, only one motion for each side may be made in any one action or special proceeding.(5)Unless required for the convenience of the court or unless good cause is shown, a continuance of the trial or hearing shall not be granted by reason of the making of a motion under this section. If a continuance is granted, the cause or matter shall be continued from day to day or for other limited periods upon the trial or other calendar and shall be reassigned or transferred for trial or hearing as promptly as possible.(6)Any affidavit filed pursuant to this section shall be in substantially the following form:(Here set forth court and cause)State of California, ss.PEREMPTORY CHALLENGE County of____, being duly sworn, deposes and says: That they are a party (or attorney for a party) to the within action (or special proceeding). That ____ the judge, court commissioner, or referee before whom the trial of the (or a hearing in the) action (or special proceeding) is pending (or to whom it is assigned) is prejudiced against the party (or their attorney) or the interest of the party (or their attorney) so that affiant cannot or believes that they cannot have a fair and impartial trial or hearing before the judge, court commissioner, or referee. Subscribed and sworn to before me this______ day of ______, 20__.(Clerk or notary public or otherofficer administering oath)(7)Any oral statement under oath or declaration under penalty of perjury made pursuant to this section shall include substantially the same contents as the affidavit above.(b)Nothing in this section shall affect or limit Section 170 or Title 4 (commencing with Section 392) of Part 2, and this section shall be construed as cumulative thereto.(c)If any provision of this section or the application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and, to this end, the provisions of this section are declared to be severable.(d)This section shall become operative January 1, 2031.SEC. 4.Section 170.6.1 is added to the Code of Civil Procedure, to read:170.6.1.(a)On or before September 30, 2028, the California Law Revision Commission shall deliver to the Legislature a study regarding recusal of judicial officers for prejudice and conflict of interest.(b)In developing the study required by this section, the California Law Revision Commission shall consult with the Commission on Judicial Performance.(c)The study shall, at minimum, include a discussion of the following:(1)The effectiveness of Section 170.6 in eliminating bias in judicial proceedings.(2)The prevalence of judicial officers hearing matters in which the canons of judicial ethics should have warranted a recusal.(3)The impact on case hearing times of judicial recusals.(4)The costs to the courts and to litigants of judicial recusals.(d)A report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(e)Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section shall become inoperative on September 30, 2031, and, as of January 1, 2032, is repealed.